California statutes. Education Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1188, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

66732.

The governing boards of each segment shall declare as policy that the student transfer agreement program shall constitute a significant role in achieving the goal of student diversity within their segments, and in ensuring that all students, particularly those currently underrepresented in higher education, have access to a university education. The governing boards of each segment shall design, adopt, and implement policies intended to facilitate successful movement of students from community colleges through the University of California and the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1188, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

66734.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall have the authority and responsibility to guarantee that all community college students have access to courses that meet the lower division baccalaureate degree requirements of the California public universities. The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, with the cooperation of the Regents of the University of California and the Trustees of the California State University, shall ensure that all students are clearly and fully informed as to which community college courses and units are transferable and meet the general education and lower division major requirements at the California State University and the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1188, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

66736.

Each community college district governing board shall ensure that its college or colleges maintain student transfer counseling centers or other counseling and student services designed and implemented to affirmatively seek out, counsel, advise, and monitor the progress of potential and identified community college transfer students.

All policies and procedures shall give preference and emphasis toward enhancing the transfer of students from economically disadvantaged families and students from traditionally underrepresented minorities, to the fullest extent possible under state and federal statutes and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1188, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

66737.

The Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges are expected to develop new programs of outreach, recruitment, and cooperation between and among the three segments of public higher education to facilitate the successful transfer of students between the community colleges and the universities. Every community college student who successfully completes the transfer agreement programs, as defined in Section 66738, in a community college shall have an appropriate place in an upper division university program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1188, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

66738.

(a) The governing board of each public postsecondary education segment shall be accountable for the development and implementation of formal systemwide articulation agreements and transfer agreement programs, including those for general education or a transfer core curriculum, and other appropriate procedures to support and enhance the transfer function. 

(b) The elements in a comprehensive transfer system shall include, but not be limited to, the following: 

(1) Enrollment and resource planning; intersegmental faculty curricular efforts. 

(2) Coordinated counseling. 

(3) Financial aid and transfer services. 

(4) Transfer articulation agreements and programs. 

(5) Specific efforts to improve diversity. 

(6) Early outreach activities.

(7) Expansion of current practices relating to concurrent enrollment of community college students in appropriate university courses. 

(8) Centers. 

(c) The governing board of each segment shall expand existing practices related to concurrent enrollment, in which community college students are provided the opportunity to take courses at University of California and California State University campuses, as space is available; and to expand opportunities for potential transfer students to participate in activities that familiarize them with the university campus.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1188, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

66739.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The California Master Plan and supporting statutes place utmost importance on the effective transfer of community college students to the University of California and the California State University as a means of providing access to the baccalaureate degree.

(2) In 2002, CSU enrolled 55,000 transfer students from community colleges.

(3) Two out of three students who earn CSU baccalaureate degrees begin in a community college.

(4) Effective use of state and student time and resources would be maximized by
 students accruing fewer unrequired units in earning their degrees.

(5) Additional access to community colleges and CSU will be created by higher graduation rates and fewer nonessential units taken.

(6) The state budget situation makes it urgent to streamline the path of the transfer student to the baccalaureate degree.

(b) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to ensure that community college students who wish to earn the baccalaureate degree at CSU are provided with a clear and effective path to this degree.

(c) This section shall not limit in any way the ability of students to gain admission through alternative paths to transfer, such as the California General Education Transfer Curriculum.

(d) On or before February 1, 2005, the Chancellor of CSU shall establish transfer student admissions requirements that give highest priority to transfer students who are qualified in accordance with subdivision (f) and paragraph (3) of subdivision (g).

(e) (1) CSU campuses admitting students qualified in accordance with subdivision (f) and paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) will make it possible for these students to complete their baccalaureate degree in the minimum number of remaining units required for that degree major.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the “minimum number of remaining units” is the minimum number of units required for a degree major after subtracting the number of fully degree-transferable units earned at the community college.

(f) The Chancellor of CSU, in
 consultation with the Academic Senate of CSU, shall establish the following components necessary for a clear degree path for transfer students:

(1) On or before June 1, 2005, the Chancellor of CSU, in consultation with the Academic Senate of CSU and with the faculty responsible for each high-demand baccalaureate degree major program, shall specify for each high-demand baccalaureate program major a systemwide lower division transfer curriculum composed of at least 45 semester course units, or the quarter-unit equivalent, that will be common across all CSU campuses offering specific major programs.

(2) (A) The systemwide lower division transfer curriculum for each high-demand baccalaureate degree major program shall be composed of at least 45 semester units, or the quarter-unit equivalent, and shall include all of the following:

(i) General education courses.

(ii) Any other lower division courses required for graduation.

(iii) Lower division components of the student’s declared major.

(iv) Elective units, as appropriate.

(B) The coursework described in subparagraph (A) shall be designated by the CSU faculty responsible for the student’s major degree program.

(3) The systemwide lower division transfer curriculum shall be specified in sufficient manner and detail so that existing and future community college lower division courses may be articulated, according to the usual procedures, to the corresponding CSU courses or course descriptions.

(g) (1) On or before June 1, 2006, the Chancellor of CSU and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in consultation with the Academic Senate of the California Community Colleges, shall articulate those lower division, baccalaureate-level courses at each campus of the California Community Colleges that meet for each degree major the systemwide lower division transfer curriculum requirements specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(2) To the extent that the goals of efficiency and urgency are advanced, existing articulation procedures such as the California Articulation Number (CAN) program shall be employed.

(3) On or before June 1, 2006, each CSU campus shall have identified any additional specific, nonelective course requirements beyond the systemwide lower division transfer
 curriculum requirements for each major, up to a maximum of 60 semester units or the quarter-unit equivalent, for the systemwide and campus-specific requirements combined. To the extent these additional course requirements are identified, each CSU campus shall provide that information to all community colleges.

(4) The Chancellor of CSU shall amend CSU’s transfer admissions procedures to encourage prospective community college transfer students to identify and, to the extent possible, commit to, a specific CSU transfer destination campus before earning more than 45 semester units, or the quarter-unit equivalent, of lower division, baccalaureate-level courses, as described in subdivision (f).

(h) As allowed by enrollment demand and available space, each CSU campus shall develop a transfer admission agreement with each student who intends to meet the requirements of this section,
 including the declaration of a major and identification of a choice of a destination campus, before earning more than 45 systemwide semester units, or the quarter-unit equivalent. The transfer admission agreement shall guarantee admission to the campus and major identified in that agreement and transfer of all 60 semester units, or the quarter-unit equivalent, as creditable to the baccalaureate degree, subject to the student’s meeting the following conditions:

(1) Completion of the 60 semester units of college-level coursework, or the quarter-unit equivalent, specified for the student’s major degree program.

(2) Declaration of a major.

(3) Satisfactory completion of the systemwide lower division transfer curriculum requirements for the student’s declared major.

(4) Satisfactory completion of any requirements beyond the systemwide lower division transfer curriculum that are specified by the CSU destination campus.

(5) Any impaction criteria for that campus or major.

(i) A CSU campus shall guarantee that the transfer students admitted under this section will be able to complete the baccalaureate degree in the minimum number of course units required for that degree.

(j) For purposes of this section, “CSU” means the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 74, Sec. 3.   (SB 619)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66739.6.

(a) In a manner that is consistent with Section 71027, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall establish a process to facilitate the identification of courses that satisfy lower division preparation requirements throughout the California Community Colleges system.

(b) A description of the process established by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to comply with subdivision (a) shall be included as part of the report required by subdivision (a) of Section 66749.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that community college districts accept credits from other community college
 districts toward an associate degree for transfer.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 72.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

66740.

Each department, school, and major in the University of California and California State University shall develop, in conjunction with community college faculty in appropriate and associated departments, discipline-specific articulation agreements and transfer program agreements for those majors that have lower division prerequisites. Faculty from the community colleges and university campuses shall participate in discipline-specific curriculum development to coordinate course content and expected levels of student competency.

Where specific majors are impacted or over-subscribed, the prescribed course of study and minimum grade point average required for consideration for upper division admission to all of these majors shall be made readily available to community college counselors, faculty, and students on an annual basis. In cases where the prescribed course of study is altered by the university department, notice of the modification shall be communicated to appropriate community college faculty and counselors at least one year prior to the deadline for application to that major and implementation by the department responsible for teaching that major. 

Community college districts, in conjunction with the California State University and the University of California, shall develop discipline-based agreements with as many campuses of the two university segments as feasible, and no fewer than three University of California campuses and five California State University campuses. The development of these agreements shall be the mutual responsibility of all three segments, and no one segment should bear the organizational or financial responsibility for accomplishing these goals. 

The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the President of the University of California shall begin the process of setting priorities to determine which community colleges will receive first attention for the development of agreements. Criteria for priority determination shall include, but not be limited to, the percentage and number of students from economically disadvantaged families and underrepresented racial and ethnic minorities, and community colleges which traditionally have not transferred many students to the University of California. The priority list shall be completed by March 1, 1992. These considerations shall not be used in any way to displace current agreements between any community college and the University of California or the California State University. 

The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Chancellor of the California State University system shall begin the process of setting priorities to determine which community colleges will receive first attention for the development of agreements. Criteria for priority determination shall include, but not be limited to, the percentage and number of students from economically disadvantaged families and underrepresented racial and ethnic minorities, and community colleges which traditionally have not transferred many students to California State Universities. The priority list shall be completed by March 1, 1992. These considerations shall not be used in any way to displace current agreements between any community college and the University of California or the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1188, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

66741.

As a result of systemwide and interinstitutional agreements, each community college student shall be assured of the opportunity to enter into a transfer agreement program enabling a student to receive high priority consideration, attain equivalent special treatment, or enter into a contract when applying for university admission at the advanced standing level. It is recognized that eligibility for transfer agreement programs will require completion of certain requirements as defined in interinstitutional agreements. It is also recognized that access to majors of choice will, in most cases, require completion of additional requirements, such as specialized coursework and attainment of a specialized grade point average.

Transfer agreement programs also shall carry high priority access to majors of choice. The University of California and the California State University shall require that continuing undergraduate students and community college transfer students are assessed against a common set of criteria for upper division standing to a specific major. However, generally speaking, access to these programs shall require completion of specialized coursework and attainment of a grade point average above the minimums defined in general admission requirements, such as those used in supplementary admission criteria for impacted or over-subscribed programs. 

Alternatively, students may also, by meeting the University of California or California State University requirements for admission at the advanced standing level, simply wish to apply as required. All students meeting these admission requirements shall be guaranteed a place somewhere in the University of California or California State University system, as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1188, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

66742.

The governing boards of the three public segments of higher education shall present annual statistical reports on transfer patterns via the California Postsecondary Education Commission to the Governor and Legislature. The reports shall include recent statistics on student enrollments by campus, segment, gender, ethnicity, and the ratio of upper division to lower division, including information on both freshman and transfer student access to the system. These reports should include, to the extent that data are available or become available, data on application, admission and enrollment information for all students by sex, ethnicity, and campus. For transfer students, this data shall indicate the segment of origin for all students. In addition, data shall be separately identified for transfer students from California Community Colleges, and shall identify the subset of applications which are completed together with admission, enrollment, and declared major information for that group. The reports shall describe the number of transfer agreements, if any, whose terms and conditions were not satisfied by either the California State University or the University of California, the number of California Community College transfer students denied either admission to the student’s first choice of a particular campus of the California State University or the University of California or the student’s first choice of a major field of study, and, among those students, the number of students who, upon denial of either of the student’s first choices, immediately enrolled at another campus of the California State University or the University of California. The reports shall also include information by sex and ethnicity on retention and degree completion for transfer students as well as for native students, and the number and percentage of baccalaureate degree recipients who transferred from a community college.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1188, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

66743.

The California Postsecondary Education Commission is requested to convene an intersegmental advisory committee on transfer access and performance for the purposes of presenting biennial reports to the Governor and the Legislature on the status of transfer policies and programs, the diligence of each segment’s board, and the effectiveness of these programs in meeting the state’s goals for transfer. The report shall include information about all of the following:

(a) The effectiveness of transfer agreement programs and activities in enhancing the transfer function overall as well as the extent to which transfer program activities have been directed at students who have been historically underrepresented in the University of California and the California State University. 

(b) The status of the implementation of the transfer core curriculum as described in Section 66720 for each community college, including information about the extent to which sophomore level courses needed for transfer are available on all community college campuses. 

(c) Progress that has been made in achieving articulation agreements in those specific majors that have lower division prerequisites, and the dissemination of this information. The committee shall also explore methods to systematically measure the extent to which the state’s goals of freshmen and transfer student access are being met, including analyses of the number of fully eligible freshmen or transfer students who are denied access to the system, and the reasons for that denial. The committee shall also address ways in which sharing of information about transfer students among the segments can be improved, including early identification of potential transfer students for intensive recruitment purposes. 

The Governor and the Legislature shall monitor the success of the University of California and the California State University in achieving their targeted enrollment levels and in implementing these reforms. A substantial failure to implement reform, to achieve the 60/40 ratio by the designated dates, or to improve the transfer rate of historically underrepresented groups significantly, shall precipitate legislative hearings to determine the reasons why any one or all of these goals have not been met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

66744.

(a) (1) Commencing with the 2004–05 academic year, and each academic year thereafter, the Trustees of the California State University shall establish a dual admissions program for eligible freshman applicants. Under this program, eligible freshman applicants may be offered the opportunity to enter into a dual admissions agreement with the California State University.

(2) Student participation in the dual admissions program under this subdivision is voluntary. It is the intent of the Legislature that the incentives provided in paragraph (3) shall encourage students otherwise eligible for admission to the California State University to attend a campus of the California Community Colleges for their
 lower-division coursework.

(3) The agreement shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, all of the following incentives:

(A) A guarantee that the student will be admitted to a California State University campus during a future academic year, provided that the student successfully completes lower-division transfer requirements at a campus of the California Community Colleges.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 76300, for each student who enrolls under this subdivision at a campus of the California Community Colleges pursuant to the dual admissions program in the 2004–05 academic year, a guarantee that any campus of the California Community Colleges shall waive fees for up to two academic years, irrespective of financial need, while that student is enrolled at that campus.

(C) For each student who enrolls, under this subdivision, at a campus of the California Community Colleges pursuant to the dual admissions program in the 2005–06 academic year, or any academic year thereafter, a guarantee that any campus of the California Community Colleges shall waive fees for each financially needy student. For the purposes of this paragraph, financial need shall be determined by the standards established by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges in Section 58620 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations or in a successor regulation.

(D) A guarantee that the student will receive counseling services from the California State University to ensure that the student is informed of the appropriate course requirements to be eligible for transfer to the California State University, and is also informed of the various financial aid options.

(4) The Chancellor of the California State University shall annually submit to the Director of Finance, as part of the budget preparation process, an estimate of the number of students expected to participate, under this subdivision, in the dual admissions program in the succeeding academic year.

(b) (1) Commencing with the 2004–05 academic year, and each academic year thereafter, the Legislature requests that the Regents of the University of California establish a dual admissions program for eligible freshman applicants. Under this program, eligible freshman applicants may be offered the opportunity to enter into a dual admissions agreement with the University of California.

(2) Student participation in the dual admissions program under this subdivision is voluntary. It is the intent of the
 Legislature that the incentives provided in paragraph (3) shall encourage students otherwise eligible for admission to the University of California to attend a campus of the California Community Colleges for their lower-division coursework.

(3) The agreement shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, all of the following incentives:

(A) A guarantee that the student will be admitted to a University of California campus during a future academic year, provided that the student successfully completes lower-division transfer requirements at a campus of the California Community Colleges.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 76300, for each student who enrolls under this subdivision at a campus of the California Community Colleges pursuant to the dual admissions program in the 2004–05 academic year, a guarantee that any
 campus of the California Community Colleges shall waive fees for up to two academic years, irrespective of financial need, while that student is enrolled at that campus.

(C) For each student who enrolls, under this subdivision, at a campus of the California Community Colleges pursuant to the dual admissions program in the 2005–06 academic year, or any academic year thereafter, a guarantee that any campus of the California Community Colleges shall waive fees for each financially needy student. For the purposes of this paragraph, financial need shall be determined by the standards established by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges in Section 58620 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations or in a successor regulation.

(D) A guarantee that the student will receive counseling services from the University of California to ensure that the student is
 informed of the appropriate course requirements to be eligible for transfer to the University of California, and is also informed of the various financial aid options.

(4) The President of the University of California is requested to annually submit to the Director of Finance, as part of the budget preparation process, an estimate of the number of students expected to participate, under this subdivision, in the dual admissions program in the succeeding academic year.

(c) Commencing with first-time freshman applicants for admission in the 2023–24 academic year, and for admission in each academic year through the 2025–26 academic year, a dual admissions agreement shall not be entered into pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 16.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

66744.1.

(a) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise, “university” means the California State University.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University establish a dual admissions program as a separate transfer pathway for first-time freshman applicants, and that the dual admissions program be designed to aid in achieving the following goals:

(1) Increasing access to the university for prospective underrepresented students experiencing limitations in high school curriculum offered, geographical constraints, or financial challenges.

(2) Increasing graduation rates among underrepresented students.

(3) Reducing student costs and time-to-degree completion.

(4) Improving transfer pathways between the California Community Colleges, the University of California, and the university.

(5) Increasing predictability for purposes of student and institutional planning.

(c) Commencing with the 2023–24 academic year, and each academic year through the 2035–36 academic year, the Trustees of the California State University shall offer a dual admissions program for first-time freshman applicants who meet the criteria described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e). Under this program, first-time
 freshman applicants may be offered the opportunity to enter into a dual admissions agreement with the university. The agreement shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) (A) A guarantee that the student will be admitted to a university campus during a future academic year if the student successfully completes an associate degree for transfer or another established course of study for transfer within three academic years at a California community college.

(B) The guarantee of admission shall be for a specific university campus selected by the student at the time of the agreement. If the student’s desired major or selected university campus is impacted or oversubscribed, the agreement may specify supplementary criteria for the student to meet, such
 as required attainment of a grade point average above the minimum defined in the general admission requirements. The university shall specify in the agreement any applicable supplementary criteria, including the specific grade point average that the student must attain in lower-division coursework. If the student plans to complete an associate degree for transfer, the supplementary criteria shall not alter the unit requirements applicable to the selected associate degree for transfer.

(2) For students who are eligible to have their fees waived pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 76300) of Chapter 2 of Part 47 of Division 7, or under the California College Promise pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 76396) of Chapter 2 of Part 47 of Division 7, a guarantee that the applicable
 campus of the California Community Colleges shall waive their fees while they are participating in the dual admissions program and enrolled at that campus.

(3) A guarantee that the student shall have access to library, counseling, and other services from the applicable university campus or the university campus nearest to the student’s primary residence, and the applicable California Community College to ensure that the student is informed of the appropriate course requirements to qualify for transfer to the university, and is also informed of the various financial aid options. California Community Colleges are requested to indicate on the student’s education plan developed pursuant to Section 78212 that the student is participating in the dual admissions program.

(d) To the extent feasible, the university is requested to provide each student who is offered the opportunity to enter into a dual admissions agreement with a provisional financial aid letter indicating the financial aid package the student may receive upon transfer to the university. The letter shall include federal, state, and institutional-based financial aid for which the student may qualify. If providing this information, the university shall clearly indicate that the financial aid package is subject to change based on updated financial information provided on the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or the California Dream Act application, as applicable, and potential changes in rules governing the provision of federal, state, and institutional-based financial aid.

(e) (1) In evaluating applications for dual admissions, the
 university shall only consider applicants who meet all of the following criteria:

(A) The applicant is a first-time freshman applicant who will meet the university’s admissions eligibility criteria only upon completion of transfer requirements at a California community college.

(B) The applicant provides supporting information regarding the applicant’s inability to meet freshman admissions eligibility criteria due to limitations in the high school curriculum offered or personal or financial hardship. For purposes of this subparagraph, supporting information may include, but is not limited to, a letter from a counselor or administrator at the applicant’s high school.

(C) The applicant plans to complete
 either of the following:

(i) An associate degree for transfer at a California community college.

(ii) Another established course of study for transfer at a California community college.

(2) The university shall prioritize offers of dual admissions agreements for students who plan to complete an associate degree for transfer at a California community college.

(f) The California Community Colleges shall take the following actions to promote the program:

(1) Share information about the program at new student orientation.

(2) Provide information about the program through an annual email to the new students for each incoming fall term.

(3) Post information about the program in an easily identifiable and accessible format on the campus website.

(4) Post information about the program in counseling offices and transfer centers.

(g) (1) On or before April 1, 2026, the university shall submit a progress report to the Department of Finance and the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information for each participating university campus:

(A) The number and names of
 community colleges that partner with the university campus on a dual admission program.

(B) A description of the support services the community college and university campus partners each are providing to dual admission students.

(C) The number of students who applied, were admitted, filed a statement of intent to register, and enrolled at each university campus pursuant to a dual admission program, disaggregated by freshman eligibility, community college of attendance, and the race, ethnicity, gender, and, as applicable, federal Pell Grant and AB 540 status of these students.

(D) For Fall 2023, 2024, and 2025, the breakdown of all transfer applicants, admits, students who submitted an intent to register, and
 students who enrolled by community college, race and ethnicity, gender, and Pell Grant or AB 540 status. The universities can satisfy this requirement through any existing public reporting, where applicable.

(2) The report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 421, Sec. 2.   (SB 640)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2037, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

66744.2.

(a) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise, “university” means the University of California.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California establish a dual admissions program as a separate transfer pathway for first-time freshman applicants, and that the dual admissions program be designed to aid in achieving the following goals:

(1) Increasing access to the university for prospective underrepresented students experiencing limitations in high school curriculum offered, geographical constraints, or financial challenges.

(2) Increasing graduation rates among
 underrepresented students.

(3) Reducing student costs and time-to-degree completion.

(4) Improving transfer pathways between the California community colleges, the California State University, and the university.

(5) Increasing predictability for the purposes of student and institutional planning.

(c) Commencing with the 2023–24 academic year, and each academic year through the 2025–26 academic year, the Regents of the University of California shall offer a dual admissions program for first-time freshman applicants who meet the eligibility criteria described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). Under this program, first-time freshman applicants may be offered the opportunity to enter into a dual admissions agreement with the university. The agreement
 shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) (A) A guarantee that the student will be admitted to a university campus during a future academic year if the student successfully completes an associate degree for transfer or a university equivalent to an associate degree for transfer established pursuant to subdivision (d), or another established course of study for transfer within two academic years at a California Community College. For purposes of this paragraph, the regents are requested to collaborate with the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges to develop processes leading to the alignment of associate degree for transfer requirements between the university, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges.

(B) The guarantee of admission shall be for a specific university campus
 selected by the student at the time of the agreement. If the student’s desired major or selected university campus is impacted or oversubscribed, the agreement may specify supplementary criteria for the student to meet, such as required attainment of a grade point average above the minimum defined in general admission requirements. The university shall specify in the agreement any applicable supplementary criteria, including the specific grade point average that the student must attain in lower-division coursework. If the student plans to complete an associate degree for transfer, the supplementary criteria shall not alter the unit requirements applicable to the selected associate degree for transfer, or university equivalent.

(2) For students who are eligible to have their fees waived pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 76300) of Chapter 2 of Part 47 of Division 7, or under the California College Promise pursuant to Article 3
 (commencing with Section 76396) of Chapter 2 of Part 47 of Division 7, a guarantee that the applicable campus of the California Community Colleges shall waive their fees while they are participating in the dual admissions program and enrolled at that campus.

(3) A guarantee that the student shall have access to library, counseling, and other services from the applicable university campus or the university campus nearest to the student’s primary residence, and the applicable California Community College to ensure that the student is informed of the appropriate course requirements to qualify for transfer to the university, and is also informed of the various financial aid options. California Community Colleges are requested to indicate on the student’s education plan developed pursuant to Section 78212 that the student is participating in the dual admissions program.

(d) For